Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1409
Filing with department; review; confidentiality.

Prior to offering the shared savings incentive payment program to any enrollee, an insurance carrier shall file a description of the program with the department in the manner determined by the director. The department may review the filing made by the insurance carrier to determine if the insurance carrier’s program complies with the requirements of the Nebraska Right to Shop Act. Filings and any supporting documentation submitted pursuant to this section are confidential until the filing has been reviewed by the department.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 19.